Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-137
Adopted person; contact child placement agency or department; when.

If an adopted person twenty-five years of age or older, after following the procedures set forth in sections 43-130 and 43-131 is not able to obtain information about such person's relatives, such person may then contact the child placement agency which handled the adoption if the name of the agency has been given to the adopted person by the department. If it is not feasible for the adopted person to contact the agency, such person may contact the department.

Laws 1980, LB 992, § 19;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 34;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 82.